Illinois, session 104th, SB1710.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-107 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-107)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 1-107)7    Sec. 1-107. Indemnification of trustees, consultants, and 8employees of retirement systems and pension funds. Every 9retirement system, pension fund, or other system or fund 10established under this Code shall may indemnify and protect 11the trustees, staff, and consultants against all damage claims 12and suits, including the defense thereof, when damages are 13sought for negligent or wrongful acts alleged to have been 14committed in the scope of employment or under the direction of 15the trustees. However, the trustees, staff and consultants 16shall not be indemnified for willful wilful misconduct and 17gross negligence. Each board is authorized to insure against 18loss or liability of the trustees, staff and consultants which 19may result from these damage claims. This insurance shall be 20carried in a company which is licensed to write such coverage 21in this State.22(Source: P.A. 80-1364.)   SB1710- 2 -LRB104 11099 RPS 21181 b1    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 2Section 8.49 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)4    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 58 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 6the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 7Act of the 104th General Assembly.